Virginia statutes. Title 5.1. Aviation.
Article 8. Through Routes, Service, Rates, etc.

§ 5.1-121.
Duties of carriers of passengers as to through routes, equipment, rates, regulations, etc.

Every common carrier or restricted common carrier of passengers by aircraft shall establish reasonable through routes with other such common carriers and provide safe and adequate service, equipment, and facilities for the transportation of passengers; shall establish, observe, and enforce just and reasonable individual and joint rates, fares and charges and just and reasonable regulations and practices relating thereto, and to the issuance, form, and substance of tickets, the carrying of personal, sample, and excess baggage, the facilities for transportation, and all other matters relating to or connected with the transportation of passengers; and in case of such joint rates, fares, and charges shall establish just, reasonable and equitable divisions thereof as between the carriers participating therein which shall not unduly prefer or prejudice any of such participating carriers.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-176; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-122.
Duties of carriers of property as to service, rates and regulations.

Every common carrier or restricted common carrier of property by aircraft shall provide safe and adequate service, equipment, and facilities for the transportation of property; and shall establish, observe, and enforce just and reasonable rates, charges, and classifications, and just and reasonable regulations and practices relating thereto and to the manner and method of presenting, marking, packing, and delivering property for transportation, the facilities for transportation, and all other matters relating to or connected with the transportation of property.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-177; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-123.
Through routes, joint rates, etc., not required may be established.

Common carriers or restricted common carriers of property by aircraft may establish reasonable routes and joint rates, charges, and classifications with other such carriers or with common carriers by railroad, motor vehicle, express and/or water; and common carriers or restricted common carriers of passengers by aircraft may establish reasonable through routes and joint rates, fares, or charges with common carriers by railroad, motor vehicle, and/or water. In case of such joint rates, fares or charges it shall be the duty of the carriers parties thereto to establish just and reasonable regulations and practices in connection therewith, and just, reasonable and equitable divisions thereof as between the carriers participating therein which shall not unduly prefer or prejudice any of such participating carriers.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-178; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-124.
Undue preference not permitted.

It shall be unlawful for any common carrier or restricted common carrier by aircraft to make, give, or cause any undue or unreasonable preference or advantage to any particular person, port, gateway, locality, or description of traffic in any respect whatsoever, or to subject any particular person, port, gateway, locality, or description of traffic to any unjust discrimination or any undue or unreasonable prejudice or disadvantage in any respect whatsoever; provided, however, that this section shall not be construed to apply to discriminations, prejudices or disadvantages to the traffic of any other carrier of whatever description.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-179; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-125.
Complaints; action of Commission thereon or on own initiative.

Any person, state board, organization, or body politic may make complaint in writing to the Commission that any rate, fare, charge, classification, rule, regulation, or practice of any common carrier or restricted common carrier by aircraft, in effect or proposed to be put into effect, is or will be in violation of §§ 5.1-121 to 5.1-124, or § 5.1-133. Whenever after hearing, upon complaint or in an investigation on its own initiative, the Commission shall be of the opinion that any individual or joint rate, fare, or charge, demanded, charged, or collected by any common carrier or restricted common carrier by aircraft or by any common or restricted common carrier by aircraft in conjunction with any common carrier by railroad, motor vehicle, express and/or water, or any classification, rule, regulation or practice whatsoever of such carrier affecting such rate, fare, or charge or the value of the service thereunder, is or will be unjust or unreasonable or unjustly discriminatory or unduly preferential or unduly prejudicial, it shall determine and prescribe the lawful rate, fare, or charge or the maximum or minimum rate, fare, or charge thereafter to be observed, or the lawful classification, rule, regulation, or practice thereafter to be made effective.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-180; 1970, c. 708; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 1.

§ 5.1-126.
Establishment of through routes, etc., by Commission.

The Commission shall, whenever deemed by it to be necessary or desirable in the public interest, after hearing, upon complaint or upon its own initiative without a complaint, establish through routes, and joint rates, fares, charges, regulations, or practices, applicable to the transportation of passengers by common or restricted common carriers by aircraft, or the maximum or minimum to be charged, and the terms and conditions under which such through routes shall be operated.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-181; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-127.
Prescribing divisions of joint rates.

Whenever, after hearing, upon complaint or upon its own initiative, the Commission is of opinion that the divisions of joint rates, fares or charges, applicable to the transportation of passengers or property by common or restricted common carriers by aircraft or by such carriers in conjunction with common carriers by railroad, motor vehicle, express and/or water are or will be unjust, unreasonable, inequitable, or unduly preferential or prejudicial as between the carriers parties thereto (whether agreed upon by such carriers, or any of them, or otherwise established), the Commission shall by order prescribe the just, reasonable, and equitable divisions thereof to be received by the several carriers. In cases where the joint rate, fare, or charge was established pursuant to a finding or order of the Commission and the divisions thereof are found by it to have been unjust, unreasonable, or inequitable, or unduly preferential or prejudicial, the Commission may also by order determine what would have been the just, reasonable, and equitable divisions thereof to be received by the several carriers, and require adjustment to be made in accordance therewith. The order of the Commission may require the adjustment of divisions between the carriers, in accordance with the order, from the date of filing the complaint or entry of order of investigation or such other date subsequent as the Commission finds justified and, in the case of joint rates prescribed by the Commission, the order as to divisions may be made effective as a part of the original order.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-182; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-128.
New rate schedule; hearing; suspension; action thereon.

Whenever there shall be filed with the Commission any schedule stating a new individual or joint rate, fare, charge, or classification for the transportation of passengers or property by a common or restricted common carrier by aircraft, or by any such carrier in conjunction with a common carrier by railroad, motor vehicle, express and/or water, or any rule, regulation, or practice affecting such rate, fare, or charge, or the value of the service thereunder, the Commission, upon complaint of any interested party or upon its own initiative, if it so orders, without answer or other formal pleading by the interested carrier or carriers, but upon reasonable notice, may enter upon a hearing concerning the lawfulness of such rate, fare or charge, or such rule, regulations or practice.

Pending such hearing and the decision thereon the Commission, by filing with such schedule and delivering to the carrier or carriers affected thereby a statement in writing of its reasons for such suspension, may suspend the operation of such schedule and defer the use of such rate, fare, or charge, or such rule, regulation, or practice, for a period of 90 days and if the proceeding has not been concluded and a final order made within such period the Commission may, from time to time, extend the period of suspension by order, but not for a longer period in the aggregate than 180 days beyond the time when such rate, fare, charge, rule, regulation or practice would otherwise go into effect.

After such hearing, whether completed before or after the rate, fare, charge, classification, rule, regulation, or practice goes into effect, the Commission may make such order with reference thereto as would be proper in a proceeding instituted after it had become effective. If the proceeding has not been concluded and an order made within the period of suspension, the proposed change of rate, fare or charge, or classification, rule, regulation, or practice, shall go into effect at the end of such period.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-183; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-129.
Goodwill, certificate, etc., not element of value in rate making.

In any proceeding to determine the justness or reasonableness of any rate, fare, or charge of any common or restricted common carrier by aircraft there shall not be taken into consideration or allowed as evidence or elements of value of the property of such carrier either goodwill, earning power, or the certificate under which such carrier is operating; and in applying for and receiving a certificate under this chapter any such carrier shall be deemed to have agreed to the provisions of this section, on its own behalf and on behalf of all transferees or lessees of such certificate.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-184; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-130.
Criteria for establishment of rates.

In the exercise of its power to prescribe just and reasonable rates for the transportation of passengers or property by common or restricted common carriers by aircraft the Commission shall give due consideration, among other factors, to the inherent advantages of transportation by such carriers; to the effect of rates upon the movement of traffic by such carriers; to the need, in the public interest, of adequate and efficient transportation service by such carriers at the lowest cost consistent with the furnishing of such service; and to the need of such carriers for revenues sufficient to enable them, under honest, economical, and efficient management, to provide such service.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-185; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-131.
Other remedies not extinguished.

Nothing in the preceding nine sections (§§ 5.1-122 through 5.1-130) shall be held to extinguish any remedy or right of action not inconsistent therewith.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-186; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-132.
Tariffs showing rates, fares and charges, etc.

Every common carrier and restricted common carrier by aircraft shall file with the Commission, and print, and keep open to public inspection, tariffs showing all the rates, fares and charges for transportation, and all services in connection therewith, of passengers or property between points on its own route and between points on its own route and points on the route of any other such carrier, or on the route of any common carrier by railroad, motor vehicle, express and/or water, when a through route and joint rate shall have been established. Such rates, fares, and charges shall be stated in terms of lawful money of the United States. The tariffs required by this section shall be published, filed, and posted in such form and manner, and shall contain such information, as the Commission by regulations shall prescribe; and the Commission is authorized to reject any tariff filed with it which is not in consonance with this section and with such regulations. Any tariff so rejected by the Commission shall be void and its use shall be unlawful.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-187; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-133.
Unlawful to charge other than published tariff.

No common carrier or restricted common carrier by aircraft shall charge or demand or collect or receive a greater or less or different compensation for transportation or for any service in connection therewith between the points enumerated in such tariff than the rates, fares, and charges specified in the tariff in effect at the time; and no such carrier shall refund or remit in any manner or by any device, directly or indirectly, or through any agent or broker or otherwise, any portion of the rates, fares, or charges so specified, or extend to any person any privileges or facilities for transportation except such as specified in its tariffs.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-188; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-134.
Changes in tariffs, etc.

No change shall be made in any rate, fare, charge, or classification, or any rule, regulation, or practice affecting such rate, fare, charge, or classification, or the value of the service thereunder, specified in any effective tariff of a common carrier or restricted common carrier by aircraft, except after thirty days’ notice of the proposed change, filed and posted in accordance with § 5.1-132. Such notice shall plainly state the change proposed to be made and the time when such change will take effect. The Commission may, in its discretion and for good cause shown, allow such change upon notice less than that herein specified or modify the requirements of this section and § 5.1-132 with respect to posting and filing of tariffs either in particular instances or by general order applicable to special or peculiar circumstances or conditions.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-189; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-135.
No transportation except when rates have been filed and published.

No common carrier or restricted common carrier by aircraft, unless otherwise provided by this chapter, shall engage in the transportation of passengers or property unless the rates, fares, and charges upon which the same are transported by such carrier have been filed and published in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-190; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-136.
Free passes or reduced rates.

No air carrier subject to the provisions of this chapter shall, directly or indirectly, issue or give any free ticket, free pass or free transportation for passengers, but nothing in this section shall apply (1) to the carriage, storage or handling of property free or at reduced rates, when such rates have been authorized or prescribed by the Commission for the United States, state or municipal governments, or for charitable purposes or to or from fairs and expositions for exhibition thereat, or (2) to the free carriage of homeless and destitute persons and the necessary agents employed in such transportation, or (3) to mileage, excursion or commutation passenger tickets.

Nor shall anything in this section be construed to prohibit any air carrier from giving reduced rates or free passage to ministers of religion, or regular traveling secretaries of the Young Men’s Christian Association or Young Women’s Christian Association, whose duties require regular travel in supervising and directing Young Men’s Christian or Young Women’s Christian Association work, secretaries of duly organized religious work, or to indigent persons, or to inmates of the Confederate homes or State homes for disabled soldiers and sailors, or to disabled soldiers and sailors, including those about to enter, and those returning home after discharge; nor from giving free carriage to its own officers, employees, and members of their families, representatives of the press and members of the Department of State Police or to any other person or persons to whom the giving of such free carriage is not otherwise prohibited by the law; nor to prevent the principal officers of any air carrier from exchanging passes or tickets with other air carriers of any air, motor vehicle, steamship, or electric railway companies for their officers, employees and members of their families.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-191; 1970, c. 708; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 17.

§ 5.1-137.
Payment of rates and charges before delivery of freight.

No common carrier or restricted common carrier by aircraft shall deliver or relinquish possession at destination of any freight transported by it until all tariff rates and charges thereon have been paid, except under such rules and regulations as the Commission may from time to time prescribe to govern the settlement of all such rates and charges, including rules and regulations for weekly or monthly settlement, and to prevent unjust discrimination or undue preference or prejudice; provided, that the provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit any such carrier from extending credit in connection with rates and charges on freight transported for the United States, for any department, bureau, or agency thereof, or for any state or territory or political subdivision thereof, or for the District of Columbia.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-192; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-138.
Liability for additional charges.

When any common carrier by aircraft is instructed by a shipper or consignor to deliver property transported by such carrier to a consignee other than the shipper or consignor, such consignee shall not be legally liable for transportation charges in respect of the transportation of such property (beyond those billed against him at the time of delivery for which he is otherwise liable) which may be found to be due after the property has been delivered to him, if the consignee (a) is an agent only and had no beneficial title in the property, and (b) prior to delivery of the property has notified the delivering carrier in writing of the fact of such agency and absence of beneficial title, and, in the case of a shipment reconsigned or diverted to a point other than that specified in the original bill of lading, has also notified the delivering carrier in writing of the name and address of the beneficial owner of the property. In such cases the shipper or consignor, or, in the case of a shipment so reconsigned or diverted, the beneficial owner shall be liable for such additional charges, irrespective of any provisions to the contrary in the bill of lading or in the contract under which the shipment was made. If the consignee has given to the carrier erroneous information as to who is the beneficial owner, such consignee shall himself be liable for such additional charges, notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section. On shipments reconsigned or diverted by any agent who has furnished the carrier with a notice of agency and the proper name and address of the beneficial owner, and when such shipments are refused or abandoned at ultimate destination, the beneficial owner shall be liable for all legally applicable charges in connection therewith.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-193; 1970, c. 708.

§ 5.1-139.
Commission may enter judgment for refunds due public and collect and distribute same.

If any air carrier or broker, upon the final decision of an appeal from the action of the Commission prescribing rates, charges, or classification of traffic, confirming or modifying the action of the Commission, shall fail to refund in the manner and within the time prescribed in the notice of the Commission all amounts which the appealing air carrier or broker may have collected pending the appeal, in excess of that authorized by such final decision, upon notice to such air carrier or broker by the Commission of such final decision, then the Commission, after thirty days’ notice to any such air carrier or broker, may, unless the amount required by such order be paid to the clerk of the Commission, render and enter judgment in the name of the Commonwealth, for the use of the persons, firms and corporations entitled to the same, against any such air carrier or broker for the aggregate amount of such collections and for the costs, and may enforce the amount of such judgment and costs by process of execution, as hereinbefore provided as to the enforcement of the judgments of the Commission. The Commission shall, upon the collection of such judgment, forthwith distribute the amount thereof, through its clerk, among the parties entitled thereto, respectively, in such manner as it may by its rules or orders prescribe, and shall, upon the payment or collection of any such judgment enter the same satisfied upon its records, and have the same satisfied on the judgment lien docket of the court of any city or county where the same may have been docketed, and the satisfaction of any such judgment shall be a bar to any further action or recovery against any such air carrier or broker to the extent of such recovery.

History.

Code 1950, § 56-194; 1970, c. 708.